California, session 20252026, AB1252.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 5015.9 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:5015.9. (a) For purposes of this section, the term “property” shall mean the property known as Elephant Hill in the El Sereno area in the City of Los Angeles.(b) The department may enter into lease agreements, pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 5060), with the City of Los Angeles and the Mountains Recreation and Conservation Authority for purposes of leasing the property.(c) After entering into the lease agreement, the State Park and Recreation Commission shall, notwithstanding any other law, classify the property as a unit of the state park system.(d) Following classification of the property as a unit of the state park system pursuant to subdivision (c), the department shall prepare a general plan for the unit pursuant to Section 5002.2.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the necessity to ensure the protection and conservation of Elephant Hill in the City of Los Angeles.